Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-660
Semitrailer, defined.

Semitrailer shall mean any vehicle, with or without motive power, designed to carry persons or property and to be drawn by a motor vehicle and so constructed that some part of its weight and that of its load rests upon or is carried by another vehicle.

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 156.